pt-BR: Tipo de instalação do spa: Portátil acima do solo; Incorporado; Portátil independente; No solo; Inflável; Plug-and-play (120 V); Spa de natação; Outro
zh-CN: 水疗设备安装类型: 地面便携式; 嵌入式; 独立便携式; 地下式; 充气式; 即插即用（120 伏）; 泳池水疗; 其他
nl: Type spa-installatie: Bovengronds draagbaar; Ingebouwd; Vrijstaand draagbaar; Inbouw; Opblaasbaar; Plug-and-play (120 V); Zwemspa; Overig
fi: Porealtaan asennustyyppi: Maanpäällinen siirrettävä; Kiinteä; Vapaasti seisova kannettava; Maahan upotettu; Täytettävä; Plug-and-play-toiminto (120 V); Uimakylpyallas; Muu
de: Einbauart für Spas: Oberirdisch mobil; Eingebaut; Freistehend tragbar; Im Boden; Aufblasbar; Plug-and-Play (120 V); Schwimm-Spa; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta namestitve masažnega bazena: Nadzemno prenosno; Vgradni; Samostoječi prenosni; Talni; Napihljiv; Priklopi in poženi (120 V); Masažna kad s pretokom za plavanje; Druga
zh-TW: SPA 安裝類型: 地上便攜式; 內建; 獨立便攜式; 地面; 充氣式; 即插即用 (120 伏特); 游泳水療池; 其他
it: Tipo di montaggio dell'idromassaggio: Fuori terra portatile; Integrato; Portatile indipendente; Interrata; Gonfiabile; Plug-and-play (120 V); Spa per il nuoto; Altro
es: Tipo de instalación del spa: Portable sobre suelo; Incorporado; Portátil independiente; En el suelo; Inflable; Conectar y usar (120 V); Spa de natación; Otros
da: Spabads installationstype: Overjordisk og transportabel; Indbygget; Fritstående bærbar; I jorden; Oppustelig; Plug-and-play (120 V); Svømmespa; Andet
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งสปา: แบบพกพาเหนือพื้นดิน; แบบในตัว; แบบตั้งพื้นและพกพาได้; ปักดิน; เติมลม; เสียบปลั๊กแล้วใช้งานได้ทันที (120 โวลต์); สระว่ายน้ำแบบสปา; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de instalare spa: Suprateran portabil; Încorporat; Portabil independent; Îngropat; Gonflabil; Conectează și utilizează (120 V); Spa pentru înot; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de instalação do spa: Portátil acima do solo; Incorporado; Portátil independente; Enterrada; Insuflável; Plug-and-play (120 V); Spa de natação; Outro
ja: スパ設置タイプ: 地上ポータブル; 内蔵; 自立型ポータブル; 地中; インフレータブル; プラグアンドプレイ（120 V）; スイムスパ; その他
en: Spa installation type: Above-ground portable; Built-in; Freestanding portable; In-ground; Inflatable; Plug-and-play (120 V); Swim spa; Other
cs: Typ instalace vířivky: Nadzemní přenosné; Vestavěné; Volně stojící přenosná; Zapuštěné; Nafukovací; Plug-and-play (120 V); Swim spa (s protiproudem); Jiné
lt-LT: SPA montavimo tipas: Viršžeminė nešiojama; Įmontuota; Laisvai pastatomas nešiojamas; Montuojama ant žemės; Pripučiama; Prijunk ir naudok (120 V); Plaukimo spa; Kita
sk-SK: Typ inštalácie kúpeľov: Prenosné nadzemné; Zabudované; Voľne stojaca prenosná; V zemi; Nafukovacie; Plug-and-play (okamžité zapojenie) (120 V); Plávacie vírivky; Iné
bg-BG: Тип на инсталацията на спа центъра: Надземно и преносимо; Вградено; Свободностоящо преносимо; В земята; Надуваемо; За включване в контакт (120 V); Плувен спа басейн; Друго
vi: Loại lắp đặt bồn tắm spa: Xách tay trên mặt đất; Tích hợp; Dạng đứng độc lập di động; Âm đất; Bơm hơi; Cắm là dùng ngay (120 V); Spa bơi; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta instalacije toplica: Nadzemno prijenosno; Ugrađeno; Samostojeće prijenosno; Tlo; Na napuhavanje; Uključi i radi (120 V); Spa za plivanje; Ostalo
sv: Typ av installation för spa: Bärbar ovan mark; Inbyggd; Fristående bärbar; markmonterad; Uppblåsbar; Plug-and-play (120 V); Simspa; Annat
ru: Тип установки спа: Надземное переносное; Встроенное; Отдельностоящий переносной; Заглубленное; Надувное; С автоматической настройкой (120 В); Плавательный спа-бассейн; Другое
el: Τύπος εγκατάστασης σπα: Υπέργειο φορητό; Εντοιχιζόμενο; Ελεύθερο φορητό; Υπόγειο; Φουσκωτό; Σύνδεση και λειτουργία (120 V); Κολυμβητικό spa; Άλλο
nb: Spa-installasjonstype: Over bakken portabelt; Innebygd; Frittstående bærbar; I bakken; Oppblåsbar; Plug-and-play (120 V); Svømmespa; Annet
fr: Type d’installation du spa: Portable hors sol; Intégré; Portable autoportant; Creusée; Gonflable; Prêt à brancher (120 V); Spa de nage; Autre
pl: Typ instalacji spa: Naziemne przenośne; Do zabudowy; Wolnostojące przenośne; Wkopane; Nadmuchiwane; Plug-and-play (120 V); Swim spa; Inne
tr: Spa montaj tipi: Yer üstü taşınabilir; Yerleşik; Bağımsız taşınabilir; Gömme; Şişme; Tak ve çalıştır (120 V); Yüzme spası; Diğer
hu: Fürdőmedence telepítési típusa: Föld feletti, áttelepíthető; Beépített; Szabadon álló, hordozható; Földben; Felfújható; Azonnal használható (120 V); Úszómedence; Egyéb
ko: 스파 설치 유형: 지상형 이동식; 내장; 독립형 이동식; 매립형; 공기주입식; 플러그 앤 플레이(120V); 스윔 스파; 기타